California, session 20252026, AB761.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 106060 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:106060. (a) The district has no authority to impose sales or special taxes, but may, with the concurrence of a majority of the member jurisdictions represented on the board of directors, cause to be submitted to voters of the district a ballot measure for the imposition of those taxes. A ballot measure shall not be submitted to the voters of the district pursuant to this subdivision on or after January 1, 2026.(b) The district, upon the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the board of directors, may submit to the voters of the district a measure proposing a retail transactions and use tax ordinance in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the district may impose a transactions and use tax pursuant to Chapter 3.95 (commencing with Section 7300.5) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(d) If approved as required by law, the district may impose and administer fees and other funding sources secured for transportation system operation, maintenance, and improvement.(e) The board of directors may set fares for public transit service by resolution or minute order.SEC. 2. Chapter 3.95 (commencing with Section 7300.5) is added to Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.95. Monterey-Salinas Transit District Transactions and Use Tax7300.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Monterey-Salinas Transit District, created pursuant to Part 17 (commencing with Section 106000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code, may impose a transactions and use tax for the support of its transportation services in accordance with Section 106060 of the Public Utilities Code at a rate of no more than 0.25 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The district adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the board of directors.(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIII C of the California Constitution.(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) other than Section 7251.1.(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, the tax rate authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by Section 7251.1.7300.6. If, as of January 1, 2035, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved pursuant to Section 7300.5, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.